Washington statutes.
RCW 36.68.410

May be initiated by resolution or petition.

Park and recreation service areas may be initiated in any unincorporated area of any county by resolution adopted by the county legislative authority or by a petition signed by ten percent of the registered voters within the proposed park and recreation service area. Incorporated areas may be included under RCW 36.68.610 and 36.68.620.

[ 1981 c 210 s 2; 1965 ex.s. c 76 s 2; 1963 c 218 s 2.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 210: See note following RCW 36.68.400.